basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX B1 Y 250
SFX B1   e           eš         e
SFX B1   e           u          [^cj]e
SFX B1   e           i          ce
SFX B1   e           i          je
SFX B1   e           eme        e
SFX B1   e           ete        e
SFX B1   e           ou         [^cj]e
SFX B1   ce          tějí       ce
SFX B1   e           í          je
SFX B1   ce          těj        ce
SFX B1   ce          tějme      ce
SFX B1   ce          tějte      ce
SFX B1   e           0          [rs]e
SFX B1   e           me         [rs]e
SFX B1   e           te         [rs]e
SFX B1   že          ž          [^áíl]že
SFX B1   íže         iž         íže
SFX B1   áže         až         áže
SFX B1   že          ži         lže
SFX B1   če          č          [^á]če
SFX B1   če          č          áče
SFX B1   ře          ři         ře
SFX B1   še          š          [^í]še
SFX B1   íše         iš         íše
SFX B1   je          j          je
SFX B1   e           i          ve
SFX B1   ne          ň          ne
SFX B1   te          ť          [^s]te
SFX B1   de          ď          [ae]de
SFX B1   de          di         [^ea]de
SFX B1   e           te         [^čžštncdv]e
SFX B1   e           me         [^čžštncdv]e
SFX B1   še          šme        [^í]še
SFX B1   še          šte        [^í]še
SFX B1   íše         išme       íše
SFX B1   íše         ište       íše
SFX B1   že          žme        [^áíl]že
SFX B1   že          žte        [^áíl]že
SFX B1   íže         ižme       íže
SFX B1   íže         ižte       íže
SFX B1   áže         ažme       áže
SFX B1   áže         ažte       áže
SFX B1   0           me         lže
SFX B1   0           te         lže
SFX B1   če          čme        [^á]če
SFX B1   če          čte        [^á]če
SFX B1   áče         ačme       áče
SFX B1   áče         ačte       áče
SFX B1   de          děme       [^ea]de
SFX B1   de          děte       [^ea]de
SFX B1   de          ďme        [ae]de
SFX B1   de          ďte        [ae]de
SFX B1   ne          ňme        ne
SFX B1   ne          ňte        ne
SFX B1   te          ťme        [^s]te
SFX B1   te          ťte        [^s]te
SFX B1   e           ěme        ve
SFX B1   e           ěte        ve
SFX B1   u           eš         [^ďťň]u
SFX B1   u           e          [^ďťň]u
SFX B1   u           eme        [^ďťň]u
SFX B1   u           ete        [^ďťň]u
SFX B1   u           ou         u
SFX B1   ňu          něš        ňu
SFX B1   ňu          ně         ňu
SFX B1   ňu          něme       ňu
SFX B1   ňu          něte       ňu
SFX B1   u           i          lžu
SFX B1   u           i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][^aeiouyáéíóúýůětž]u
SFX B1   u           ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][bdfmnpvw]u
SFX B1   u           eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsšz]u
SFX B1   u           ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][bdfmnpvw]u
SFX B1   u           ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsšz]u
SFX B1   du          ď          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]du
SFX B1   du          ďme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]du
SFX B1   du          ďte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]du
SFX B1   nu          ň          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nu
SFX B1   nu          ňme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nu
SFX B1   nu          ňte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nu
SFX B1   tu          ť          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]tu
SFX B1   tu          ťme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]tu
SFX B1   tu          ťte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]tu
SFX B1   u           0          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsz]u
SFX B1   u           me         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsz]u
SFX B1   u           te         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsz]u
SFX B1   íšu         iš         íšu
SFX B1   íšu         išme       íšu
SFX B1   íšu         ište       íšu
SFX B1   i           eš         [^t]i
SFX B1   i           eš         [^t]i
SFX B1   i           e          [^t]i
SFX B1   i           eme        [^t]i
SFX B1   i           ete        [^t]i
SFX B1   i           í          [^t]i
SFX B1   i           0          ji
SFX B1   i           me         ji
SFX B1   i           te         ji
SFX B1   m           š          ím
SFX B1   m           0          ím
SFX B1   0           e          ím
SFX B1   m           te         ím
SFX B1   ím          0          žím
SFX B1   ím          me         žím
SFX B1   ím          te         žím
SFX B1   ím          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ím
SFX B1   ím          ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][bdfmnptvw]ím
SFX B1   ím          eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsšz]ím
SFX B1   ím          ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][bdfmnptvw]ím
SFX B1   ím          ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][cčghjklrřsšz]ím
SFX B1   ojím        ůj         ojím
SFX B1   ojím        ůjme       ojím
SFX B1   ojím        ůjte       ojím
SFX B1   0           i          [aáěíuý]t
SFX B1   ít          iji        ít
SFX B1   ít          iješ       ít
SFX B1   ít          ije        ít
SFX B1   ít          ijeme      ít
SFX B1   ít          ijete      ít
SFX B1   ít          ijí        ít
SFX B1   ít          ij         ít
SFX B1   ít          ijme       ít
SFX B1   ít          ijte       ít
SFX B1   ít          il         ít
SFX B1   ít          ila        ít
SFX B1   ít          ilo        ít
SFX B1   ít          ili        ít
SFX B1   ít          ily        ít
SFX B1   ět          ím         ět
SFX B1   ět          íš         ět
SFX B1   ět          í          ět
SFX B1   ět          íme        ět
SFX B1   ět          íte        ět
SFX B1   ět          0          ět
SFX B1   ět          me         ět
SFX B1   ět          te         ět
SFX B1   t           0          ět
SFX B1   ět          íc         ět
SFX B1   ět          íce        ět
SFX B1   ýt          yji        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yješ       ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yje        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yjeme      ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yjete      ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yjí        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yj         ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yjme       ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yjte       ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yl         ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yla        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          ylo        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yli        ýt
SFX B1   ýt          yly        ýt
SFX B1   át          aji        [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          aješ       [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          aje        [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajeme      [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajete      [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ají        [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          aj         [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajme       [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajte       [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajíc       [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ajíce      [^bpvmnřd]át
SFX B1   át          ěji        [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ěješ       [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ěje        [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějeme      [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějete      [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějí        [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ěj         [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějme       [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějte       [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějíc       [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   át          ějíce      [bpvmn]át
SFX B1   0           i          dát
SFX B1   t           m          dát
SFX B1   t           š          dát
SFX B1   t           0          dát
SFX B1   t           me         dát
SFX B1   t           te         dát
SFX B1   át          ají        dát
SFX B1   át          ej         dát
SFX B1   át          ejme       dát
SFX B1   át          ejte       dát
SFX B1   át          eji        řát
SFX B1   át          eješ       řát
SFX B1   át          eje        řát
SFX B1   át          ejeme      řát
SFX B1   át          ejete      řát
SFX B1   át          ejí        řát
SFX B1   át          ej         řát
SFX B1   át          ejme       řát
SFX B1   át          ejte       řát
SFX B1   át          ejíc       řát
SFX B1   át          ejíce      řát
SFX B1   out         uji        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         uješ       [^m]out
SFX B1   out         uje        [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ujeme      [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ujete      [^m]out
SFX B1   out         ují        [^m]out
