basic-cs.dic
blahopřát/B1T1N1
bít/B1N1
dobít/B1N1
dohrát/B1T1N1
dolít/B1N1
doplout/B1N1
dopít/B1N1
dopřát/B1T1N1
dostat/B1N1
dout/B1N1
dozrát/B1N1
dožít/B1T1N1I1
hnít/B1N1
hrát/B1T1N1
hřát/B1N1
krýt/B1T1N1
kát/B1N1
lát/B1N1
lít/B1N1
mýt/B1T1N1
nabít/B1N1
nadát/B1N1
nahrát/B1T1N1
nalít/B1N1
napít/B1N1
nastat/B1N1
nasát/B1O1N1
našít/B1T1N1
nýt/B1N1H1
obout/B1T1N1
odbít/B1N1
odehrát/B1T1N1
odkrýt/B1T1N1
odlít/B1N1
odplout/B1N1
odvát/B1O1N1
ohřát/B1O1N1
omýt/B1T1N1
opít/B1N1
ožít/B1N1
plout/B1N1
poblahopřát/B1T1N1
pobít/B1N1
podlít/B1N1
pohrát/B1T1N1
pokrýt/B1T1N1
polít/B1N1
pookřát/B1N1
popřát/B1T1N1
potrpět/B1T1N1
pousmát/B1N1
použít/B1T1N1
povstat/B1N1
požít/B1T1N1I1
probít/B1N1
prohrát/B1T1N1
prohřát/B1O1N1
prolít/B1N1
proplout/B1T1N1
propít/B1N1
proslout/B1N1
prospat/B1T1N1
protrpět/B1T1N1
prožít/B1T1N1
pít/B1N1
přebít/B1N1
předehrát/B1T1N1
přehrát/B1T1N1
překrýt/B1T1N1
přelít/B1N1
přespat/B1T1N1
přestat/B1N1
přetrpět/B1T1N1
přežít/B1T1N1
přibít/B1N1
přihrát/B1T1N1
přikrýt/B1T1N1
přilít/B1N1
připlout/B1N1
připít/B1N1
přisát/B1O1N1
přišít/B1T1N1
přát/B1T1N1
rozbít/B1N1
rozehrát/B1T1N1
rozehřát/B1O1N1
rozesmát/B1N1
rozlít/B1N1
roztát/B1T1N1
rýt/B1T1N1
sehrát/B1T1N1
sesout/B1T1N1
sešít/B1T1N1
skrýt/B1T1N1
slout/B1N1
slít/B1N1
smát/B1N1
smýt/B1T1N1
strpět/B1T1N1
sát/B1O1N1
sžít/B1T1N1
trpět/B1T1N1
tát/B1T1N1
týt/B1N1
ubít/B1N1
udát/B1N1
uhrát/B1T1N1
ukrýt/B1T1N1
ulít/B1N1
umýt/B1T1N1
upít/B1N1
usmát/B1N1
uspat/B1T1N1
ustat/B1N1
utrpět/B1T1N1
uzrát/B1N1
ušít/B1T1N1
užít/B1T1N1
vlát/B1N1
vlít/B1N1
vplout/B1N1
vrýt/B1T1N1
vybít/B1N1
vyhrát/B1T1N1
vylít/B1N1
vyplout/B1N1
vypít/B1N1
vyrýt/B1T1N1
vysmát/B1N1
vyspat/B1T1N1
vysát/B1O1N1
vytrpět/B1T1N1
využít/B1T1N1
vyvstat/B1N1
vyzrát/B1N1
vyšít/B1T1N1
vyžít/B1T1N1I1
vát/B1O1N1
vít/B1N1
výt/B1N1
vžít/B1T1N1
zabít/B1N1
zahrát/B1T1N1
zahřát/B1O1N1
zakrýt/B1T1N1
zalít/B1N1
zaostat/B1N1
zapít/B1N1
zarýt/B1T1N1
zasmát/B1N1
zaspat/B1T1N1
zastat/B1N1
zavlát/B1N1
zavát/B1O1N1
zavýt/B1N1
zašít/B1T1N1
zažít/B1T1N1I1
zbít/B1N1
zdát/B1N1
zlít/B1N1
zneužít/B1T1N1
zout/B1T1N1
zrát/B1N1
zůstat/B1N1
čít/B1N1
šít/B1T1N1
žít/B1T1N1I1
